Illinois, session 104th, HB59.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-29 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-29)7    Sec. 10-29. Remote educational programs.8    (a) For purposes of this Section, "remote educational 9program" means an educational program delivered to students in 10the home or other location outside of a school building that 11meets all of the following criteria:12        (1) A student may participate in the program only 13    after the school district, pursuant to adopted school 14    board policy, and a person authorized to enroll the 15    student under Section 10-20.12b of this Code determine 16    that a remote educational program will best serve the 17    student's individual learning needs. The adopted school 18    board policy shall include, but not be limited to, all of 19    the following:20            (A) Criteria for determining that a remote 21        educational program will best serve a student's 22        individual learning needs. The criteria must include 23        consideration of, at a minimum, a student's prior   HB0059- 2 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1        attendance, disciplinary record, and academic history. 2            (B) Any limitations on the number of students or 3        grade levels that may participate in a remote 4        educational program.5            (C) A description of the process that the school 6        district will use to approve participation in the 7        remote educational program. The process must include 8        without limitation a requirement that, for any student 9        who qualifies to receive services pursuant to the 10        federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 11        Improvement Act of 2004, the student's participation 12        in a remote educational program receive prior approval 13        from the student's individualized education program 14        team.15            (D) A description of the process the school 16        district will use to develop and approve a written 17        remote educational plan that meets the requirements of 18        subdivision (5) of this subsection (a).19            (E) A description of the system the school 20        district will establish to determine student 21        participation in instruction in accordance with the 22        remote educational program.23            (F) A description of the process for renewing a 24        remote educational program at the expiration of its 25        term.26            (G) Such other terms and provisions as the school   HB0059- 3 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1        district deems necessary to provide for the 2        establishment and delivery of a remote educational 3        program.4        The adopted school board policy shall allow a student 5    to apply to participate in the remote educational program 6    if the student (i) provides an employee pay stub, (ii) has 7    a medical need, including pregnancy, or (iii) needs to 8    care for a family member, including the student's own 9    child. 10        (2) The school district has determined that the remote 11    educational program's curriculum is aligned to State 12    learning standards and that the program offers instruction 13    and educational experiences consistent with those given to 14    students at the same grade level in the district.15        (3) The remote educational program is delivered by 16    instructors that meet the following qualifications:17            (A) they are licensed under Article 21B of this 18        Code;19            (B) (blank); and20            (C) they have responsibility for all of the 21        following elements of the program: planning 22        instruction, diagnosing learning needs, prescribing 23        content delivery through class activities, assessing 24        learning, reporting outcomes to administrators and 25        parents and guardians, and evaluating the effects of 26        instruction.  HB0059- 4 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1        (4) During the period of time from and including the 2    opening date to the closing date of the regular school 3    term of the school district established pursuant to 4    Section 10-19 of this Code, participation in a remote 5    educational program may be claimed for evidence-based 6    funding purposes under Section 18-8.15 of this Code on any 7    calendar day, notwithstanding whether the day is a day of 8    pupil attendance or institute day on the school district's 9    calendar or any other provision of law restricting 10    instruction on that day. If the district holds year-round 11    classes in some buildings, the district shall classify 12    each student's participation in a remote educational 13    program as either on a year-round or a non-year-round 14    schedule for purposes of claiming evidence-based funding. 15    Outside of the regular school term of the district, the 16    remote educational program may be offered as part of any 17    summer school program authorized by this Code.18        (5) Each student participating in a remote educational 19    program must have a written remote educational plan that 20    has been approved by the school district and a person 21    authorized to enroll the student under Section 10-20.12b 22    of this Code. The school district and a person authorized 23    to enroll the student under Section 10-20.12b of this Code 24    must approve any amendment to a remote educational plan. 25    The remote educational plan must include, but is not 26    limited to, all of the following:  HB0059- 5 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1            (A) Specific achievement goals for the student 2        aligned to State learning standards.3            (B) A description of all assessments that will be 4        used to measure student progress, which description 5        shall indicate the assessments that will be 6        administered at an attendance center within the school 7        district.8            (C) A description of the progress reports that 9        will be provided to the school district and the person 10        or persons authorized to enroll the student under 11        Section 10-20.12b of this Code.12            (D) Expectations, processes, and schedules for 13        interaction between a teacher and student.14            (E) A description of the specific responsibilities 15        of the student's family and the school district with 16        respect to equipment, materials, phone and Internet 17        service, and any other requirements applicable to the 18        home or other location outside of a school building 19        necessary for the delivery of the remote educational 20        program.21            (F) If applicable, a description of how the remote 22        educational program will be delivered in a manner 23        consistent with the student's individualized education 24        program required by Section 614(d) of the federal 25        Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement 26        Act of 2004 or plan to ensure compliance with Section   HB0059- 6 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1        504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.2            (G) A description of the procedures and 3        opportunities for participation in academic and 4        extracurricular activities and programs within the 5        school district.6            (H) The identification of a parent, guardian, or 7        other responsible adult who will provide direct 8        supervision of the program. The plan must include an 9        acknowledgment by the parent, guardian, or other 10        responsible adult that he or she may engage only in 11        non-teaching duties not requiring instructional 12        judgment or the evaluation of a student. The plan 13        shall designate the parent, guardian, or other 14        responsible adult as non-teaching personnel or 15        volunteer personnel under subsection (a) of Section 16        10-22.34 of this Code.17            (I) The identification of a school district 18        administrator who will oversee the remote educational 19        program on behalf of the school district and who may be 20        contacted by the student's parents with respect to any 21        issues or concerns with the program.22            (J) The term of the student's participation in the 23        remote educational program, which may not extend for 24        longer than 12 months, unless the term is renewed by 25        the district in accordance with subdivision (7) of 26        this subsection (a).  HB0059- 7 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1            (K) A description of the specific location or 2        locations in which the program will be delivered. If 3        the remote educational program is to be delivered to a 4        student in any location other than the student's home, 5        the plan must include a written determination by the 6        school district that the location will provide a 7        learning environment appropriate for the delivery of 8        the program. The location or locations in which the 9        program will be delivered shall be deemed a long 10        distance teaching reception area under subsection (a) 11        of Section 10-22.34 of this Code.12            (L) Certification by the school district that the 13        plan meets all other requirements of this Section.14        (6) Students participating in a remote educational 15    program must be enrolled in a school district attendance 16    center pursuant to the school district's enrollment policy 17    or policies. A student participating in a remote 18    educational program must be tested as part of all 19    assessments administered by the school district pursuant 20    to Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code at the attendance center 21    in which the student is enrolled and in accordance with 22    the attendance center's assessment policies and schedule. 23    The student must be included within all accountability 24    determinations for the school district and attendance 25    center under State and federal law.26        (7) The term of a student's participation in a remote   HB0059- 8 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1    educational program may not extend for longer than 12 2    months, unless the term is renewed by the school district. 3    The district may only renew a student's participation in a 4    remote educational program following an evaluation of the 5    student's progress in the program, a determination that 6    the student's continuation in the program will best serve 7    the student's individual learning needs, and an amendment 8    to the student's written remote educational plan 9    addressing any changes for the upcoming term of the 10    program. 11    For purposes of this Section, a remote educational program 12does not include instruction delivered to students through an 13e-learning program approved under Section 10-20.56 of this 14Code. 15    (b) A school district may, by resolution of its school 16board, establish a remote educational program.17    (c) (Blank).18    (d) The impact of remote educational programs on wages, 19hours, and terms and conditions of employment of educational 20employees within the school district shall be subject to local 21collective bargaining agreements.22    (e) The use of a home or other location outside of a school 23building for a remote educational program shall not cause the 24home or other location to be deemed a public school facility. 25    (f) A remote educational program may be used, but is not 26required, for instruction delivered to a student in the home   HB0059- 9 -LRB104 03443 LNS 13466 b1or other location outside of a school building that is not 2claimed for evidence-based funding purposes under Section 318-8.15 of this Code.4    (g) School districts that, pursuant to this Section, adopt 5a policy for a remote educational program must submit to the 6State Board of Education a copy of the policy and any 7amendments thereto, as well as data on student participation 8in a format specified by the State Board of Education. The 9State Board of Education may perform or contract with an 10outside entity to perform an evaluation of remote educational 11programs in this State.12    (h) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules 13necessary to ensure compliance by remote educational programs 14with the requirements of this Section and other applicable 15legal requirements. 16(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-894, eff. 5-20-22.)